Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Contracts for Printing, Stationery and Office Supplies

§ 19-13-101.
Definition of “stationery.”

The term stationery, as applied to purchases for the counties of the state, includes everything properly so called, and the boards of supervisors shall provide for everything in contracts for stationery as herein defined that can be conveniently so purchased.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4218; 1906, § 4766; Laws, 1913, ch. 3, Hemingway’s 1917, § 7537; 1930, § 5935; 1942, § 8977; Laws, 1968, ch. 506, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved August 8, 1968).

§ 19-13-103.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1981, ch. 306, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved February 9, 1981).

[Codes, 1906, § 4767; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7538; 1930, § 5936; 1942, § 8978; Laws, 1928, ch. 195; Laws, 1935, ch. 33; Laws, 1936, ch. 222; Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 17]

§ 19-13-105.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1980, ch. 440, § 28 eff from and after January 1, 1981.

[Codes, 1942, § 8980; Laws, 1936, ch. 222]

§ 19-13-107.
Out-of-state contracts.

The boards of supervisors, if satisfied that the bids offered are materially more expensive to the taxpayers of the state than prevails in other adjoining states, may require such bids to be lowered and if the resident bidders refuse to lower such bids, the boards of supervisors may make temporary contracts with printers and stationers outside the state until such time as contracts satisfactory to the boards of supervisors can be made with resident printers and stationers.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8981; Laws, 1936, ch. 222.

§ 19-13-109.
Bids may be rejected.

The board of supervisors may reject any and all bids and readvertise for new ones and no bid shall be considered unless accompanied by a certified check of a solvent bank, for at least Twenty five Dollars ($25.00) or said sum in cash, the same to be forfeited to the county in the event the bidder shall fail for ten days after the acceptance of his bid to enter into the contract awarded; and when a contract is awarded the contractor shall give bond as provided in Section 19-13-115. The deposit of all bidders as above provided shall be returned to the bidders when the award has been made and the bond above mentioned given.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 4768; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7540; 1930, § 5938; 1942, § 8983; Laws, 1913, ch. 3.

§ 19-13-111.
Bids and contracts to be definite.

All bids and contracts for stationery, blank books, office supplies and other things must be specific in stating the kinds or brands and qualities of all articles, as far as practicable; the weight per ream and material of all paper; the price per quire and the weight per ream of books and record books, with the style of binding and size of each kind of book duly classified; and, other things being equal, the several boards shall give the preference to those bids which are most specific as to the price and quality of the various articles. In case bids are in all respects equal between resident and nonresident bidders, the board of supervisors shall give preference to citizens of this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4220; 1906, § 4770; Laws, 1913, ch. 3, Hemingway’s 1917, § 7542; 1930, § 5939; 1942, § 8984; Laws, 1968, ch. 506, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved August 8, 1968).

§ 19-13-113.
Rejection of bids when bidder is unfair.

If it appears to the satisfaction of the board of supervisors, on any opening of bids, that there has been a combination between the bidders or that some of them are connected with a trust or combine, or that the bidding is purposely unfair, in raising the prices of some articles and lowering those of others out of proportion so that it is difficult to determine which of the bids is the lowest and best, all bids may be rejected and new bids shall be called for and requested.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4221; 1906, § 4771; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7543; 1930, § 5940; 1942, § 8985; Laws, 1913, ch. 3; Laws, 1968, ch. 506, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved August 8, 1968).

§ 19-13-115.
Bonds required of contractors.

The board of supervisors shall require the successful bidder to execute a bond with sufficient surety or sureties to be approved by it in a sufficient penalty conditioned for the faithful performance of the contract and the prompt delivery, free of all charges for freight and otherwise, at the price specified. The bond of the contractor taken by the board of supervisors shall be filed with the clerk of the board; and such bond shall be subject to the provisions of law applicable to the bonds of county officers. The board may accept the undertaking of an approved guaranty company as surety, with or without other sureties, on such bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4222; 1906, § 4772; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7544; 1930, § 5941; 1942, § 8986; Laws, 1913, ch. 3; Laws, 1968, ch. 506, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved August 8, 1968).

§ 19-13-117.
Payment of bills.

All accounts and bills for the purchase of stationery, records, blank books, office supplies, and other things herein authorized by the board of supervisors shall be approved and allowed as other claims against said counties are required to be, and warrants issued for the payment out of the county treasury.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4224; 1906, § 4774; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7546; 1930, § 5943; 1942, § 8988; Laws, 1913, ch. 3; Laws, 1968, ch. 506, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved August 8, 1968).

§ 19-13-119.
Penalty for noncompliance with the law.

Members of the board of supervisors and county officers failing to comply with the requirements of Sections 19-13-101 through 19-13-119 shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not less than Ten Dollars ($10.00) or imprisonment or both, as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917; § 7539; 1930, § 5937; 1942, § 8982; Laws, 1916, ch. 135.